District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.29

Inspectors of election.

(a)

A public corporation shall, and any other corporation may, appoint one or more inspectors to act at a meeting of shareholders and make a written report of the inspectors’ determinations. Each inspector shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of the inspector’s ability.

(b)

The inspectors shall:

(1)

Ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each;

(2)

Determine the shares represented at a meeting;

(3)

Determine the validity of proxies and ballots;

(4)

Count all votes; and

(5)

Determine the result.

(c)

An inspector may be an officer or employee of the corporation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-308.22.